Massachusetts, session 194th, S2208.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The eighteenth clause of section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 122, by adding the following
sentence:- “Legal holiday” shall also include Election Day, the first Tuesday in November in
even-numbered years; provided, however, that observance of said holiday shall not apply to
public employees whose jobs pertain to the operation and administration of elections.
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out section 178 and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 178. Paid leave of absence from work for voting.
of 2

(a) For purposes of this section, the terms ''employer'' and “employee” shall be defined as
in section 1 of chapter 175M.
(b) An employee who is eligible to vote shall be entitled, upon request, to take 2 hours of
paid leave to be used for the purpose of casting a ballot in any annual or special municipal or
state primary or election. An employee may elect to take paid voting leave at any point during
the early voting or mail voting period provided by law, or on the date of a primary or election.
Employees eligible to observe Election Day as a holiday, as defined in the eighteenth clause of
section 7 of chapter 4, shall not be entitled to take additional paid leave pursuant to this
paragraph for biennial general elections.
(c) It shall be unlawful for any employer to interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise
of, or the attempt to exercise, the right to take paid voting leave under this section as a negative
factor in any employment action such as evaluation, promotion, disciplinary action or
termination, or otherwise subjecting an employee to discipline for the use of paid voting leave
under this section.
of 2